Wyoming statutes. Title 9 Administration of the Government
Article 12. Tobacco Settlement Funds
§ 9-4-1208.
Penalties and other remedies.

In addition to, or in lieu of, any other civil or criminal remedy provided by law, upon a determination that any person has violated subsection W.S. 9-4-1205(k), the department may revoke or suspend the license of any licensed wholesaler in the manner provided by W.S. 39-18-108(c)(v). Each stamp affixed and each offer to sell cigarettes in violation of W.S. 9-4-1205(k) shall constitute a separate violation. For each violation under W.S. 9-4-1205(k), the department may also impose a civil penalty in an amount not to exceed the greater of five hundred percent (500%) of the retail value of the cigarettes sold, or five thousand dollars ($5,000.00) upon a determination of a violation of W.S. 9-4-1205(k).

Any cigarettes that have been sold, offered for sale or possessed for sale in this state, or imported for personal consumption in this state in violation of W.S. 9-4-1205(k) shall be:

Deemed contraband under W.S. 39-18-108(c)(i);

Subject to seizure and forfeiture as provided in W.S. 39-18-108(c)(i); and

Destroyed.

The attorney general may seek an injunction to restrain a threatened or actual violation of W.S. 9-4-1205(k) or 9-4-1207(a) or (d) by a licensed wholesaler and to compel the licensed wholesaler to comply with those provisions.

No person shall sell or distribute cigarettes or acquire, hold, own, possess, transport, import or cause to be imported cigarettes that the person knows or should know are intended for distribution or sale in this state in violation of W.S. 9-4-1205(k). Any person who violates this section is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by a fine of not more than one hundred dollars ($100.00), imprisonment for not more than six (6) months, or both.

Any person who violates W.S. 9-4-1205(k) engages in an unfair and deceptive trade practice in violation of W.S. 40-12-105(a)(i).

In any action brought by the state to enforce this act, the state may recover the costs of investigation, expert witness fees, costs of the action and reasonable attorney fees.

If a court determines that a person has violated any provision of this act, the court shall order any profits, gain or other benefit from the violation to be surrendered and paid to the Wyoming tobacco settlement trust fund established by W.S.

9-4-1203

. Unless otherwise expressly provided, the remedies or penalties provided by this act are cumulative to each other and to the remedies or penalties available under all other laws of this state.

History.

Laws 2003, ch. 150, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 9-4-1210(a)(xi).

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2003, ch. 150, § 4, provides: “To the extent the provisions of W.S.

9-4-1205

through

9-4-1210

, as created by section 1 of this act, and the provisions of W.S.

9-4-1201

and

9-4-1202

conflict, the provisions of W.S.

9-4-1201

and

9-4-1202

shall control. If any provision created by section 1 of this act causes W.S. 9-4-1201 and 9-4-1202 to fail as a qualifying or model statute, as those terms are defined in the master settlement agreement entered into on November 23, 1998, by the state and leading United States tobacco product manufacturers, then that portion of this act shall not be valid.”

§ 9-4-1209.
Rules and regulations.

The department and the attorney general may promulgate rules and regulations necessary to effect the purposes of this act.

History.

Laws 2003, ch. 150, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 9-4-1210(a)(xi).

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2003, ch. 150, § 4, provides: “To the extent the provisions of W.S.

9-4-1205

through

9-4-1210

, as created by section 1 of this act, and the provisions of W.S.

9-4-1201

and

9-4-1202

conflict, the provisions of W.S.

9-4-1201

and

9-4-1202

shall control. If any provision created by section 1 of this act causes W.S. 9-4-1201 and 9-4-1202 to fail as a qualifying or model statute, as those terms are defined in the master settlement agreement entered into on November 23, 1998, by the state and leading United States tobacco product manufacturers, then that portion of this act shall not be valid.”

§ 9-4-1210.
Definitions.

As used in this act:

“Brand family” means all styles of cigarettes sold under the same trademark and differentiated by means of additional modifiers or descriptors, including, but not limited to, “menthol,” “lights,” “kings” and “100s” and includes any brand name, alone or in conjunction with any other word, trademark, logo, symbol, motto, selling message, recognizable pattern of colors or any other indicia of product identification identical, similar to or identifiable with a previously known brand of cigarettes;

“Cigarette” means any product that contains nicotine, is intended to be burned or heated under ordinary conditions of use, and consists of or contains:

Any roll of tobacco wrapped in paper or in any substance not containing tobacco;

Tobacco, in any form, that is functional in the product, which, because of its appearance, the type of tobacco used in the filler, or its packaging and labeling, is likely to be offered to, or purchased by, consumers as a cigarette; or

Any roll of tobacco wrapped in any substance containing tobacco which, because of its appearance, the type of tobacco used in the filler, or its packaging and labeling, is likely to be offered to, or purchased by, consumers as a cigarette described in subparagraph (A) of this paragraph. The term “cigarette” includes “roll-your-own” meaning any tobacco which, because of its appearance, type, packaging, or labeling is suitable for use and likely to be offered to, or purchased by, consumers as tobacco for making cigarettes. For purposes of “roll your own” cigarettes, nine one-hundredths (.09) ounces of “roll-your-own” tobacco shall constitute one (1) individual cigarette.

“Department” means the Wyoming department of revenue;

“Licensed wholesaler” means a person authorized to affix tax stamps to packages or other containers or cigarettes under W.S. 39-18-102(a) or any person who is required to pay the cigarette tax imposed under W.S.

39-18-103

;

“Master settlement agreement” means the settlement agreement, and related documents, entered into on November 23, 1998 by the state and leading United States tobacco product manufacturers;

“Nonparticipating manufacturer” means any tobacco product manufacturer who is not a participating manufacturer;

“Participating manufacturer” means as defined in section II(jj) of the master settlement agreement;

“Qualified escrow fund” means an escrow arrangement with a federally or state chartered financial institution having no affiliation with any tobacco product manufacturer and having assets of at least one billion dollars ($1,000,000,000.00) where the arrangement requires that the financial institution hold the escrowed funds’ principal for the benefit of releasing parties and prohibits the tobacco product manufacturer placing the funds into escrow from using, accessing or directing the use of the funds’ principal except as consistent with W.S. 9-4-1202(b);

“Tobacco product manufacturer” means, but shall not include an affiliate of a tobacco product manufacturer unless the affiliate itself falls within any of subparagraphs (A) through (C) of this paragraph, an entity that after the date of enactment of this act directly and not exclusively through any affiliate:

Manufactures cigarettes anywhere that the manufacturer intends to be sold in the United States, including cigarettes intended to be sold in the United States through an importer, (except where the importer is an original participating manufacturer, as that term is defined in the master settlement agreement, who will be responsible for the payments under the master settlement agreement with respect to the cigarettes as a result of the provisions of subsection II(mm) of the master settlement agreement and who pays the taxes specified in subsection II(z) of the master settlement agreement, and provided that the manufacturer of the cigarettes does not market or advertise the cigarettes in the United States);

Is the first purchaser anywhere for resale in the United States of cigarettes manufactured anywhere that the manufacturer does not intend to be sold in the United States; or

Becomes a successor of an entity described in subparagraph (A) or (B) of this paragraph.

“Units sold” means the number of individual cigarettes sold in the state by the applicable tobacco product manufacturer, whether directly or through a distributor, retailer or similar intermediary or intermediaries, during the year in question, as measured by excise taxes collected by the state on packs, or “roll-your-own” tobacco containers, bearing the excise tax stamp of the state. The department of revenue shall promulgate regulations as are necessary to ascertain the amount of state excise tax paid on the cigarettes of such tobacco product manufacturer for each year;

“This act” means W.S.

9-4-1205

through

9-4-1210

.

History.

Laws 2003, ch. 150, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (i) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2003, ch. 150, § 4, provides: “To the extent the provisions of W.S.

9-4-1205

through

9-4-1210

, as created by section 1 of this act, and the provisions of W.S.

9-4-1201

and

9-4-1202

conflict, the provisions of W.S.

9-4-1201

and

9-4-1202

shall control. If any provision created by section 1 of this act causes W.S. 9-4-1201 and 9-4-1202 to fail as a qualifying or model statute, as those terms are defined in the master settlement agreement entered into on November 23, 1998, by the state and leading United States tobacco product manufacturers, then that portion of this act shall not be valid.”

§ 9-4-1211.
Cigarette rolling machines.

Any person who maintains at a retail establishment a machine which enables a person to process tobacco, or any product made or derived from tobacco, into a roll or tube shall be deemed a tobacco product manufacturer and the resulting product shall be deemed a cigarette for purposes of this article.

History.

Laws 2012, ch. 65, § 1.

Effective date. —

Laws 2012, ch. 65, § 3, makes the act effective July 1, 2012.